Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,264
Swimming pool, defined.

For purposes of sections 81-15,264 to 81-15,270, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Swimming pool means any artificial basin of water modified, improved, constructed, or installed solely for the purpose of public swimming, wading, diving, recreation, or instruction;

(2) Swimming pool includes, but is not limited to, a pool serving a community, a subdivision, an apartment complex, a condominium, a club, a camp, a school, an institution, a park, a manufactured home park, a hotel, a motel, a recreational area, or a water park;

(3) Swimming pool includes a spa, hot tub, or whirlpool or similar device which (a) is designed for recreational use and not to be drained, cleaned, and refilled after each individual use and (b) may consist of elements, including, but not limited to, hydrojet circulation, hot water, cold water, mineral baths, air induction systems, or any combination thereof; and

(4) Swimming pool does not include an artificial lake, a pool at a private residence intended only for the use of the owner and guests, or a pool operated exclusively for medical treatment, physical therapy, water rescue training, or training of divers.

Laws 1969, c. 760, § 1, p. 2875;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 81;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-4301;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 4.